Alaska statutes. Title 31. Oil and Gas.
Article 2. Bonds and Notes.

Sec. 31.25.160.
Bonds and notes.

The corporation may, by resolution, issue bonds and bond anticipation notes to provide funds to carry out its purposes.

The principal of and interest on the bonds or notes are payable from corporation funds. Bond anticipation notes may be payable from the proceeds of the sale of bonds or from the proceeds of sale of other bond anticipation notes or, in the event bond or bond anticipation note proceeds are not available, from other funds or assets of the corporation. Bonds or notes may be additionally secured by a pledge of a grant or contribution from the federal government, or a corporation, association, institution, or person, or a pledge of money, income, or revenue of the corporation from any source.

Bonds or bond anticipation notes may be issued in one or more series and shall be dated, bear interest at the rate or rates a year or within the maximum rate, be in the denomination, be in the form, either coupon or registered, carry the conversion or registration provisions, have the rank or priority, be executed in the manner and form, be payable from the sources in the medium of payment and place or places within or outside the state, be subject to authentication by a trustee or fiscal agent, and be subject to the terms of redemption with or without premium, as the resolution of the corporation may provide. Bond anticipation notes shall mature at the time or times that are determined by the corporation. Bonds shall mature at a time, not exceeding 50 years from their date, that is determined by the corporation. Before the preparation of definitive bonds or bond anticipation notes, the corporation may issue interim receipts or temporary bonds or bond anticipation notes, with or without coupons, exchangeable for bonds or bond anticipation notes when the definitive bonds or bond anticipation notes have been executed and are available for delivery.

Bonds or bond anticipation notes may be sold in the manner and on the terms the corporation determines.

If an officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature appears on bonds or notes or coupons attached to them ceases to be an officer before the delivery of the bond, note, or coupon, the signature or facsimile is valid the same as if the officer had remained in office until delivery.

In a resolution of the corporation authorizing or relating to the issuance of bonds or bond anticipation notes, the corporation has power by provisions in the resolution that will constitute covenants of the corporation and contracts with the holders of the bonds or bond anticipation notes

to pledge to a payment or purpose all or a part of its revenue to which its right then exists or may thereafter come into existence the money derived from the revenue and the proceeds of the bonds or notes;

to covenant against pledging all or a part of its revenue or against permitting or suffering a lien on the revenue of its property;

to covenant as to the use and disposition of payments of principal or interest received by the corporation on investments held by the corporation;

to covenant as to establishment of reserves or sinking funds and the making of provision for and the regulation and disposition of the reserves or sinking funds;

to covenant with respect to or against limitations on a right to sell or otherwise dispose of property of any kind;

to covenant as to bonds and notes to be issued, and their limitations, terms, and condition, and as to the custody, application, and disposition of the proceeds of the bonds and notes;

to covenant as to the issuance of additional bonds or notes or as to limitations on the issuance of additional bonds or notes and the incurring of other debts;

to covenant as to the payment of the principal of or interest on the bonds or notes, as to the sources and methods of the payment, as to the rank or priority of the bonds or notes with respect to a lien or security, or as to the acceleration of the maturity of the bonds or notes;

to provide for the replacement of lost, stolen, destroyed, or mutilated bonds or notes;

to covenant against extending the time for the payment of bonds or notes or interest on the bonds or notes;

to covenant as to the redemption of bonds or notes and privileges of their exchange for other bonds or notes of the corporation;

to covenant to create or authorize the creation of special funds of money to be held in pledge or otherwise for operating expenses, payment or redemption of bonds or notes, reserves, or other purposes, and as to the use and disposition of the money held in the funds;

to establish the procedure, if any, by which the terms of a contract or covenant with or for the benefit of the holders of bonds or notes may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds or notes the holders of which must consent to amendment or abrogation, and the manner in which the consent may be given;

to covenant as to the custody of any of its properties or investments, the safekeeping and insurance of its properties or investments, and the use and disposition of insurance money;

to covenant as to the time or manner of enforcement or restraint from enforcement of any rights of the corporation arising by reason of or with respect to nonpayment or violation of the terms of an agreement to which the corporation is a party or with respect to which the corporation has enforcement rights;

to provide for the rights, liabilities, powers, and duties arising upon the breach of a covenant, condition, or obligation, and to prescribe the events of default and the terms and conditions on which any or all of the bonds, notes, or other obligations of the corporation become or may be declared due and payable before maturity and the terms and conditions on which a declaration and its consequences may be waived;

to vest in a trustee or trustees within or outside the state the property, rights, powers, and duties in trust as the corporation may determine, which may include any or all of the rights, powers, and duties of a trustee appointed by the holders of the bonds or notes, and to limit or abrogate the right of the holders of the bonds or notes of the corporation to appoint a trustee under this chapter or limit the rights, powers, and duties of the trustee;

to pay the costs or expenses incident to the enforcement of the bonds or notes or of the provisions of the resolution or of a covenant or agreement of the corporation with the holders of its bonds or notes;

to agree with a corporate trustee, which may be a trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or outside the state, as to the pledging or assigning of revenue or funds to which or in which the corporation has any rights or interest; the agreement may further provide for other rights and remedies exercisable by the trustee as may be proper for the protection of the holders of the bonds or notes of the corporation and not otherwise in violation of law and may provide for the restriction of the rights of an individual holder of bonds or notes of the corporation;

to appoint and provide for the duties and obligations of any paying agent or paying agents, or other fiduciaries as the resolution may provide within or outside the state;

to limit the rights of the holders of the bonds or notes to enforce a pledge or covenant securing bonds or notes;

to make covenants other than and in addition to the covenants expressly authorized in this section, of like or different character, and to make covenants to do or refrain from doing acts and things as may be necessary, or as may be convenient and desirable, to better secure bonds or notes or that, in the absolute discretion of the corporation, would tend to make bonds or notes more marketable, notwithstanding that the covenants, acts, or things may not be enumerated in this section.

History.

(§ 3 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 31.25.170.
Independent financial advisor.

In negotiating the sale of bonds or bond anticipation notes to an underwriter, the corporation may retain a financial advisor. A financial advisor retained under this section must be independent from the underwriter.

History.

(§ 3 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 31.25.180.
Validity of pledge.

The pledge of assets or revenue of the corporation to the payment of the principal of or interest on an obligation of the corporation is valid and binding from the time the pledge is made, and the assets or revenue are immediately subject to the lien of the pledge without physical delivery or further act. The lien of the pledge is valid and binding against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the corporation, regardless of whether those parties have notice of the lien of the pledge. This section does not prohibit the corporation from selling assets subject to a pledge, except that the sale may be restricted by the trust agreement or resolution providing for the issuance of the obligations.

History.

(§ 3 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 31.25.190.
Capital reserve funds.

The corporation may not establish a capital reserve fund as described in this section except as expressly authorized by law. The enactment of this section does not express that authorization. Upon enactment of a law expressly authorizing the establishment of a capital reserve fund described in this section and for the purpose of securing one or more issues of its obligations, the corporation may establish one or more special funds, called “capital reserve funds,” and shall pay into those capital reserve funds

money appropriated and made available by the state for the purpose of any of those funds;

proceeds of the sale of its obligations, to the extent provided in the resolution or resolutions of the corporation authorizing their issuance; and

other money that may be made available to the corporation for the purposes of those funds from another source.

All money held in a capital reserve fund, except as provided in this section, shall be used as required, solely for the payment of the principal of obligations or of the sinking fund payments with respect to those obligations; the purchase or redemption of obligations; the payment of interest on obligations; or the payment of a redemption premium required to be paid when those obligations are redeemed before maturity. However, money in a fund may not, at any time, be withdrawn from the fund in an amount that would reduce the amount of that fund to less than the capital reserve requirement set out in (c) of this section, except for the purpose of making, with respect to those obligations, payment, when due, of principal, interest, redemption premiums, and the sinking fund payments for the payment of which other money of the corporation is not available. Income or interest earned by, or increment to, a capital reserve fund, because of the investment of the fund or other amounts in it, may be transferred by the corporation to other funds or accounts of the corporation to the extent that the transfer does not reduce the amount of the capital reserve fund below the capital reserve fund requirement.

If the corporation decides to issue obligations secured by a capital reserve fund, the obligations may not be issued if the amount in the capital reserve fund is less than a percentage, not exceeding 10 percent of the principal amount of all of those obligations secured by that capital reserve fund then to be issued and then outstanding in accordance with their terms, as may be established by resolution of the corporation (called the “capital reserve fund requirement”), unless the corporation, at the time of issuance of the obligations, deposits in the capital reserve fund from the proceeds of the obligations to be issued or from other sources an amount that, together with the amount then in the fund, would not be less than the capital reserve fund requirement.

In computing the amount of a capital reserve fund for the purpose of this section, securities in which all or a portion of the funds are invested shall be valued at par or, if purchased at less than par, at amortized costs as the term is defined by resolution of the corporation authorizing the issue of the obligations, or by some other reasonable method established by the corporation by resolution. Valuation on a particular date shall include the amount of interest earned or accrued to that date.

The chair of the corporation shall annually, not later than January 2, make and deliver to the governor and chairs of the house and senate finance committees a certificate stating the sum, if any, required to restore a capital reserve fund to the capital reserve fund requirement. The legislature may appropriate that sum, and the corporation shall deposit all sums appropriated by the legislature during the then current fiscal year for the restoration in the proper capital reserve fund. Nothing in this section creates a debt or liability of the state.

History.

(§ 3 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 31.25.200.
Remedies.

A holder of obligations or coupons attached to them issued under this chapter, and a trustee under a trust agreement or resolution authorizing the issuance of the obligations, except as restricted by a trust agreement or resolution, either at law or in equity,

may enforce all rights granted under this chapter, under the trust agreement or resolution, or under another contract executed by the corporation under this chapter; and

may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this chapter or by the trust agreement or resolution to be performed by the corporation or by an officer of the corporation.

History.

(§ 3 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 31.25.210.
Negotiable instruments.

All obligations and interest coupons attached to them are negotiable instruments under the laws of this state, subject only to applicable provisions for registration.

History.

(§ 3 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 31.25.220.
Obligations eligible for investment.

Obligations issued under this chapter are securities in which all public officers and public bodies of the state and its political subdivisions and all insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. Those obligations may be deposited with a state or municipal officer of an agency or political subdivision of the state for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds, notes, or obligations of the state is authorized by law.

History.

(§ 3 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 31.25.230.
Refunding obligations.

The corporation may provide for the issuance of refunding obligations for the purpose of refunding obligations then outstanding that have been issued under this chapter, including the payment of the redemption premium on them and interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of the obligations. The issuance of the obligations, the maturities and other details of them, the rights of the holders of them, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the corporation with respect to them are governed by the provisions of this chapter that relate to the issuance of obligations, insofar as those provisions may be appropriate.

Refunding obligations may be sold or exchanged for outstanding obligations issued under this chapter, and, if sold, the proceeds may be applied, in addition to other authorized purposes, to the purchase, redemption, or payment of the outstanding obligations.

History.

(§ 3 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 31.25.240.
Credit of state not pledged.

Obligations issued under this chapter do not constitute a debt, liability, or obligation of the state or of a political subdivision of the state or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state or of a political subdivision of the state but are payable solely from the revenue or assets of the corporation. Each obligation issued under this chapter shall contain on its face a statement that the corporation is not obligated to pay the obligation or the interest on the obligation except from the revenue or assets of the corporation and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the state or of any political subdivision of the state is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on the obligation. This subsection applies to all debt, obligations, and liabilities of the corporation regardless of how the debt, obligations, or liabilities are created, including by contract, tort, or bond or note issuance. Except as provided in this subsection, a person may not bring suit against the state or a political subdivision of the state other than the corporation in the courts of the state to enforce or seek a remedy with respect to a debt, obligation, or liability of the corporation.

Expenses incurred by the corporation in carrying out the provisions of this chapter are payable from funds provided under this chapter, and liability may not be incurred by the corporation in excess of those funds.

History.

(§ 3 ch 11 SLA 2013)